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LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)

DTC C0226 /2 1 toC 1226 /26 ABSSolenoidCircuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
This solenoid goes on when signals are received from the ECU and controls the pressure acting on the wheel
cylinders thus controlling the braking force.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C0226 / 21
Openorshort inSFRHorSFRRcircuit continues for0.05
sec. or more.

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSFRHorSFRRcircuit

C0236 / 22
Openorshort inSFLHorSFLRcircuit continues for0.05
sec. or more.

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSFLHorSFLRcircuit

C0246 / 23
Openorshort inSRRorSRHcircuit continues for0.05sec.
or more.

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSRRorSRHcircuit

C1225 / 25
Openorshort inSA1circuit continues for0.05sec.or
more.

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSA1circuit

C1226 / 26
Openorshort inSA2circuit continues for0.05sec.or
more.

SHydraulicbrakebooster
SSA2circuit

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the actuator solenoid circuit, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid relay and pro-
hibits ABS control and the brake system becomes normal.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check hydraulic brake booster solenoid.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the 2 connectors from hydraulic brake booster.
CHECK:
Check continuity between the terminal BS and each of termi-
nals SFRH, SFRR, SFLH, SFLR, SRH, SRR, SA1 and SA2 of
hydraulic brake booster connector.
OK:

Continuity
HINT:
Resistance of each solenoid at 20 ˚ C (68 ˚ F)
SFRH, SFLH, SRH: 4.75 − 5.25 �
SFRR, SFLR, SRR: 2.00 − 2.40 �
SA1, SA2 : 3.5 − 3.9 �

NG Replace hydraulic brake booster.

OK

2 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between ABS ECU
and actuator (See page IN−24).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

If the same code is still output after the DTC is deleted, check the contact condition of each con-
nection. If the connections are normal, the ECU may be defective.


